apertium-si-ta.si.dix
	<pardef n="clitic_belonging_animate">
		<e><p><l>ගේ</l><r><j/>ගේ<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="clitic_in">
		<e><p><l> ේ</l><r><j/> ේ<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	
	

	<!-- Adjectives -->
	<pardef n="අලුත්/__adj">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ය</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ම</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    
	<pardef n="හොඳ/__adj">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යි</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ම</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="ඉතා/__adj">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ම</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="වඩා/__adj">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ත්</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="පිරිමි/__adj">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="වේග/__adj">
		<e><p><l>යෙන්</l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>වත්ම</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	
</pardefs>

		<e lm="අලුත්"><i>අලුත්</i><par n="අලුත්/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="කළු"><i>කළු</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="සුදු"><i>සුදු</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="හොඳ"><i>හොඳ</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="නරක"><i>නරක</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="උස"><i>උස</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="දිග"><i>දිග</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="මිටි"><i>මිටි</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="කොට"><i>කොට</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="කුඩා"><i>කුඩා</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="ලස්සන"><i>ලස්සන</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="කැත"><i>කැත</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="උණුසුම්"><i>උණුසුම්</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="සීතල"><i>සීතල</i><par n="අලුත්/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="යහපත්"><i>යහපත්</i><par n="අලුත්/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="ඉතා"><i>ඉතා</i><par n="ඉතා/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="කැමැති"><i>කැමැති</i><par n="අලුත්/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="විශාල"><i>විශාල</i><par n="අලුත්/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="පිරිමි"><i>පිරිමි</i><par n="පිරිමි/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="ගැහැණු"><i>ගැහැණු</i><par n="පිරිමි/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="වේග"><i>වේග</i><par n="වේග/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="සෙමින්"><i>සෙමින්</i><par n="ඉතා/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="සාවදානව"><i>සාවදානව</i><par n="ඉතා/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="සත්තකින්"><i>සත්තකින්</i><par n="ඉතා/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="සතුට"><i>සතුට</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="සැම"><i>සැම</i><par n="පිරිමි/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="වඩා"><i>වඩා</i><par n="වඩා/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="පරණ"><i>පරණ</i><par n="හොඳ/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="වෙනත්"><i>වෙනත්</i><par n="අලුත්/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="අවසන්"><i>අවසන්</i><par n="පිරිමි/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="අමතර"><i>අමතර</i><par n="පිරිමි/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="ටිකක්"><i>ටිකක්</i><par n="පිරිමි/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="ආසන්න"><i>ආසන්න</i><par n="අලුත්/__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="කිසි"><i>කිසි</i><par n="අලුත්/__adj"/></e>
